DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTERPOWER DI-335
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI3RP-01

DTC | coz27s/ 11,co279/ 12 | ABS Solenoid Relay Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This relay supplies power to each ABS solenoid. After the ignition switch is turned ON, if the initial check is
OK, the relay goes on.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Conditions (1) and (2) continue for 0.2 secs. or more:

(1) ECU terminal IG1 voltage is 9.5 V to 18.5 V and the
solenoid relay is ON, however, the contact point of the

C0278/11 solenoidrelay is OFF.

(2) With solenoid relay ON, ECU terminal IG1 voltage
becomes 9.5 V or less and the contact point
of the solenoid relay does not become ON.

* ABS solenoidrelay
* ABS solenoid relay circuit

Immediately after ECU terminal IG1 becomes ON, and
solenoid relay is OFF, however, when the condition that
the solenoid relay due to the contact point is ON continues
for 0.2 secs. or more.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the ABS solenoid relay circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and
prohibits ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.

WIRING DIAGRAM
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DI-336 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

Startthe inspectionfrom step in case of usingthe hand -heldtesterand startfrom step 2in case of notusing
the hand -heldtester.

1 Check ABS solenoid relay operation.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe operation sound ofthe ABS solenoid relay when operating it withthe hand —-heldtester.
OK:

The operation sound of the ABS solenoid relay should be heard.

OK> Go to step 4.

N

G

2Checkvoltage betweenterminals 1 and2ofEngine RoomR/BNo.2 (for ABS so-

lenoid relay).
1 PREPARATION:
Remove ABS solenoid relay from Engine Room R/B No. 2.
L) ® CHECK:
S Measure the voltage between terminals 1 and 2 of Engine
(=) Room R/B No. 2 (for ABS solenoidrelay).
) U OK:
9@@@ = Voltage: 10 - 14V
2 F04447

NG> Check and repair harness or connector.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER DI-337
SUPPLY SYSTEM

3 | Check ABS solenoid relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS solenoid relay from Engine Room R/B No. 2.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid relay.
%
Terminals 4 and 6 Continuity
(Reference value 80 Q)
Terminals 2 and 3 Continuity
Terminals 1 and 3 Open
CHECK:
(@) Apply battery voltage between terminals 4 and 6.
(b)  Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid
relay.
OK:
2?2322 Terminals 2 and 3 Open
fioess Fo0o42 Terminals 1 and 3 Continuity

NG> Replace ABS solenoid relay.

4 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between ABS sole-
noid relay and ABS ECU (See page IN-24).

@

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.

NG > Repair or replace harness or connector.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)



